Hawaii statutes.
[§346C-6]
Investments. (a) With the
advice of the director of finance to ensure investment soundness, the board of
trustees shall invest moneys in the long-term care benefits fund solely in:

(1) Obligations of any of the following classes:

(A) Obligations issued or guaranteed as to
principal and interest by the United States or by any state thereof or by any
municipal or political subdivision or school district of any of the foregoing;
provided that the principal of and interest on such obligations are payable in
currency of the United States, or sovereign debt instruments issued by agencies
of, or guaranteed by foreign governments;

(B) Revenue bonds, whether or not permitted
by any other provision hereof, of the State or any political subdivision thereof,
including the board of water supply of the city and county of Honolulu, and
street or improvement district bonds of any district or project in the State;
and

(C) Obligations issued or guaranteed by any
federal home loan bank including consolidated federal home loan bank
obligations, the Home Owner's Loan Corporation, the Federal National Mortgage
Association, or the Small Business Administration;

(2) Obligations eligible by law for purchase in the
open market by federal reserve banks;

(3) Securities and futures contracts in which in the
informed opinion of the board of trustees it is prudent to invest funds of the
system, including currency, interest rate, bond, and stock index futures
contracts and options on such contracts to hedge against anticipated changes in
currencies, interest rates, and bond and stock prices that might otherwise have
an adverse effect upon the value of the system's securities portfolios; covered
put and call options on securities; and stock; whether or not the securities,
stock, futures contracts, or options on futures are expressly authorized by or
qualify under the foregoing paragraphs, and notwithstanding any limitation of
any of the foregoing paragraphs; and

(4) Any other investments deemed secure on the advice
of the state director of finance.

(b) The
board of trustees shall submit to the legislature no later than January 1 of
every year, an annual report for the preceding fiscal year. The annual report
shall include information concerning:

(1) Investments,
including the types and amounts;

(2) Current balance in the fund;

(3) Projected liabilities for the upcoming year;

(4) Current reserve requirements to meet the
projected liabilities for the upcoming year;

(5) Amount of claims paid and taxes received in the year
immediately preceding the issuance of the report; and

(6) Any other
useful information to determine the fiscal soundness of the fund. [L 2002, c
245, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next